District of Columbia statutes.
21-583

Physicians, psychiatrists and qualified psychologists as witnesses.

A physician, psychiatrist or qualified psychologist making application or conducting an examination under this chapter is a competent and compellable witness at any trial, hearing or other proceeding conducted pursuant to this chapter and the physician- or psychologist-patient privilege is not applicable.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 760, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
Feb. 24, 1984, D.C. Law 5-48, § 11(a)(19), 30 DCR 5778
1981 Ed., § 21-583.
1973 Ed., § 21-583.